Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.060

Statutory debt limits may be exceeded.

Appropriations made under authority and by virtue of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 and debts incurred by any county in carrying out the provisions of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 may exceed all statutory limitations otherwise applicable and limiting the debt any county may incur.

[ 1945 c 188 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-5.]